Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1403
Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Program; created; purposes; administration; funding.

(1) The Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Program is created. The commission shall administer the program. The purposes of the program are to:

(a) Propel Nebraska agricultural producers to lead the nation in precision agriculture connectivity, sustainability, traceability, and autonomy to accelerate rural economic development; and

(b) Provide high-speed Internet service to farm sites as defined in section 77-1359 in unserved areas of the state as defined in section 86-1302.

(2) For the purpose of carrying out the program, the commission may utilize funds provided to the state through the federal Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, not to exceed two million dollars per year.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 14.